Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB1424.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 301.1(f)(3) of the act of December 31, 1965 (P.L.1257, No.511), known as The Local Tax Enabling Act, is 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627 amended and the subsection is amended by adding a clause to read:Section 301.1. Delegation of Taxing Powers and Restrictions Thereon.--* * *(f) Such local authorities shall not have authority by virtue of this act:* * *(3) Except on sales of admission to places of amusement, other than on sales of admission to professional baseball events in a city of the third class with a population of not less than one hundred six thousand and not more than one hundred seven thousand based on the 2000 Federal decennial census, or on sales or other transfers of title or possession of property, to levy, assess or collect a tax on the privilege of employing such tangible property as is now or does hereafter become subject to a State tax[; and for the purposes of this clause, real property rented for camping purposes shall not be considered a place of amusement];* * *(18) To levy, assess or collect an amusement or admissions tax on the charge imposed on a guest for the sale of admission to or for the privilege of admission to a recreational campground.Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250HB1424PN1653 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324